Maryland, session 2026, HB1481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1481*

HOUSE BILL 1481
Article – Health – General
17–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION
COLLECTED FROM THE PATIENT FOR THE PATIENT’S OWN FUTURE USE DURING OR
AFTER A MEDICAL PROCEDURE.
(C) “DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION COLLECTED
FROM AN INDIVIDUAL OTHER THAN THE PATIENT WHO IS SPECIFICALLY
DESIGNATED BY THE PATIENT OR THE PATIENT’S PHYSICIAN FOR USE BY THE
PATIENT DURING OR AFTER A MEDICAL PROCEDURE.
[(b)] (D) “Permit” means a permit issued by the Secretary:
(1) To operate a tissue bank in this State; or
(2) To represent or service in this State a tissue bank that is outside this
State.
[(c)] (E) (1) “Tissue bank” means an establishment that obtains, stores,
processes, distributes, or sells human blood or other human tissue for use in the human
body.
(2) “Tissue bank” includes a blood bank.
17–315.
(A) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REQUIRE A TISSUE BANK TO ESTABLISH A NEW DONATION
PROGRAM;
(2) REQUIRE ACCEPTANCE OF BLOOD THAT DOES NOT MEET SAFETY
OR REGULATORY STANDARDS;
(3) INTERFERE WITH EMERGENCY TRANSFUSION PROTOCOLS; OR
(4) ALTER EXISTING SCOPE–OF–PRACTICE LAWS, FEDERAL BLOOD
SAFETY REGULATIONS, OR TISSUE BANK LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS.
(B) A TISSUE BANK MAY NOT DENY OR PROHIBIT A PHYSICIAN–ORDERED
AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION SOLELY ON THE

HOUSE BILL 1481 3
BASIS OF INTERNAL POLICY IF ALL APPLICABLE SAFETY, TESTING, AND
REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS ARE MET.
(C) A TISSUE BANK MAY DECLINE A REQUEST FOR A PHYSICIAN–ORDERED
AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION ONLY IF
COMPLIANCE IS NOT FEASIBLE DUE TO MEDICAL, LOGISTICAL, OR REGULATORY
CONSTRAINTS.
(D) DECISIONS REGARDING THE MEDICAL APPROPRIATENESS OF
AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION SHALL BE MADE
BY THE TREATING PHYSICIAN IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PATIENT.
(E) EACH TISSUE BANK SHALL PROVIDE EACH PATIENT CLEAR
INFORMATION REGARDING AVAILABLE BLOOD DONATION OPTIONS CONSISTENT
WITH INFORMED CONSENT STANDARDS.
19–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(D–1) “AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION
COLLECTED FROM THE PATIENT FOR THE PATIENT’S OWN FUTURE USE DURING OR
AFTER A MEDICAL PROCEDURE.
(D–2) “DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION COLLECTED
FROM AN INDIVIDUAL OTHER THAN THE PATIENT WHO IS SPECIFICALLY
DESIGNATED BY THE PATIENT OR THE PATIENT’S PHYSICIAN, FOR USE BY THE
PATIENT DURING OR AFTER A MEDICAL PROCEDURE.
19–310.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection and notwithstanding any
other provision of law, a hospital offering bone marrow transplant services shall allow an
individual to donate bone marrow to any individual.
(2) An individual may donate bone marrow to another individual if a
licensed physician determines, based on the physician’s medical judgment, that the
donation of the bone marrow is in the best interests of the donee and there is no substantial
risk of medical injury to the donor.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(I) REQUIRE A HOSPITAL TO ESTABLISH A NEW DONATION
PROGRAM;

HOUSE BILL 1481
(II) REQUIRE ACCEPTANCE OF BLOOD THAT DOES NOT MEET
SAFETY OR REGULATORY STANDARDS;
(III) INTERFERE WITH EMERGENCY TRANSFUSION PROTOCOLS;
OR
(IV) ALTER EXISTING SCOPE–OF–PRACTICE LAWS, FEDERAL
BLOOD SAFETY REGULATIONS, OR HOSPITAL LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS.
(2) A PATIENT RECEIVING A MEDICAL PROCEDURE, OR AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED BY THE PATIENT TO MAKE MEDICAL DECISIONS ON THE
PATIENT’S BEHALF, MAY REQUEST AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION OR DIRECTED
BLOOD DONATION FOR A PLANNED MEDICAL PROCEDURE IF AN AUTOLOGOUS
BLOOD DONATION OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION IS ORDERED BY THE PATIENT’S
TREATING PHYSICIAN AND IS MEDICALLY APPROPRIATE.
(3) A HOSPITAL MAY NOT DENY OR PROHIBIT A PHYSICIAN–ORDERED
AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION SOLELY ON THE
BASIS OF INTERNAL POLICY IF ALL APPLICABLE SAFETY, TESTING, AND
REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS ARE MET.
(4) A HOSPITAL MAY DECLINE A REQUEST FOR A
PHYSICIAN–ORDERED AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION ONLY IF
COMPLIANCE IS NOT FEASIBLE DUE TO MEDICAL, LOGISTICAL, OR REGULATORY
CONSTRAINTS.
(5) DECISIONS REGARDING THE MEDICAL APPROPRIATENESS OF
AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION SHALL BE MADE BY THE TREATING
PHYSICIAN IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PATIENT.
(6) EACH HOSPITAL SHALL PROVIDE EACH PATIENT CLEAR
INFORMATION REGARDING AVAILABLE BLOOD DONATION OPTIONS CONSISTENT
WITH INFORMED CONSENT STANDARDS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.